Hawaii statutes.
§150-26 Removal from sale. Any seed
offered for sale in violation of this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder,
shall be removed from sale by the vendor upon receiving a stop-sale order from
the department. The vendor shall withhold the seed from sale until the
violation has been corrected and a written release has been issued by the
department. [L 1945, c 90, pt of §2; RL 1955, §26-10; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §150-26; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 164, §8; am L
1991, c 73, §6]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next